Maine, session 132, LD1069.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4722, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 202, §1, is
further amended to read:
B. Social studies and history, including American history, government, and civics and
personal finance--2 years or the equivalent in standards achievement;
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §4722, sub-§2, ¶D, as amended by PL 2019, c. 202, §1, is
further amended to read:
D. Science, including at least one year of laboratory study--2 years or the equivalent
in standards achievement; and
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §4722, sub-§2, ¶E, as amended by PL 2019, c. 202, §1, is
further amended to read:
E. Fine arts, which may include art, music, forensics or drama--one year or the
equivalent in standards achievement.; and
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §4722, sub-§2, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. Personal finance--one course, which must be taught as a stand-alone course.